Washington statutes.
RCW 35.75.060

Use of street and road funds for bicycle paths, lanes, routes and improvements authorized—Standards.

Any city or town may use any funds available for street or road construction, maintenance, or improvement for building, improving, and maintaining bicycle paths, lanes, roadways, and routes, and for improvements to make existing streets and roads more suitable and safe for bicycle traffic: PROVIDED, That any such paths, lanes, roadways, routes, or streets for which any such street or road funds are expended shall be suitable for bicycle transportation purposes and not solely for recreation purposes. Bicycle facilities constructed or modified after December 31, 2012, shall meet or exceed the standards adopted by the design standards committee under RCW 35.78.030.

[ 2012 c 67 s 2; 1982 c 55 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 141 s 10.]

NOTES:

Intent—2012 c 67: "It is the intent of the legislature that the Washington state department of transportation shall provide for the needs of drivers, public transportation vehicles and patrons, bicyclists, and pedestrians of all ages and abilities in all planning, programming, design, construction, reconstruction, retrofit, operations, and maintenance activities and products.

It is also the intent of the legislature that the department shall view all transportation improvements as opportunities to improve safety, access, and mobility for all travelers in Washington and recognize bicycle, pedestrian, and transit modes as integral elements of the transportation system.

The increase in Washington's older adult population, which is up to forty percent of total population in some counties, increases the need for locally based transportation options and a statewide transportation system less reliant on the automobile.

Washington is committed to providing community-based options for individuals with disabilities who require access to a broader range of transportation options.

Washington believes the full integration of all modes in the design of streets and roadways will increase the capacity and efficiency of the road network, reduce traffic congestion, improve mobility options, and limit greenhouse gas emissions.

Washington believes regular walking and bicycling improves physical health, increases mental well-being, and helps reduce the risk of cardiovascular disease, Type 2 diabetes, some cancers, and other chronic diseases. Increased physical activity is also critical to combating the obesity crisis in Washington." [ 2012 c 67 s 1.]